Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1855.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Climate-related Emergency Paid Leave Act.Section 2. Findings and declarations.(a) Legislative findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) This Commonwealth is experiencing an increasing number of climate-related emergencies, including floods, wildfires, extreme heat events and severe storms.(2) Climate-related emergencies create unsafe conditions that can prevent workers from safely traveling to or performing their jobs.(3) Many Pennsylvania workers, particularly in low-wage 12345678910111213141516171819 and hourly jobs, lack access to paid leave and are forced to choose between personal safety and income.(4) Providing guaranteed paid leave during climate-related emergencies is a matter of public safety, economic stability and climate resilience.(b) Purpose.--The purpose of this act is to ensure that all workers in this Commonwealth can protect themselves and their families during a climate-related emergency without risking financial hardship.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Climate-related emergency." A natural disaster or extreme weather event attributable to or worsened by climate change, including floods, wildfires, extreme heat, hurricanes, severe storms or similar events that results in a:(1) proclamation of disaster emergency by the Governor under 35 Pa.C.S. § 7301(c) (relating to general authority of Governor); or(2) presidential declaration of a major disaster or emergency under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 68 (relating to disaster relief)."Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Employ." To engage, suffer or permit to work. A worker is considered an employee and not an independent contractor, unless all three of the following conditions are satisfied:(1) The worker is free from the control and direction of the employer in connection with the performance of the work.20250HB1855PN2293 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The worker performs work that is outside the usual course of the employer's business.(3) The worker is customarily engaged in an independently established trade, occupation or business of the same nature as that involved in the work performed."Employee." A person employed by an employer."Employer." The Commonwealth, its political subdivisions and their instrumentalities or any person, association, entity, organization, partnership, business trust, limited liability company or corporation that directly or indirectly, or through an agent or any other person, employs or exercises any control over the wages, hours or working conditions of an employee."Fund." The Climate-related Emergency Paid Leave Fund established under section 5.Section 4. Paid leave entitlement.(a) Amount of leave.--An employer shall provide each employee with up to 10 days of paid leave per calendar year during a climate-related emergency.(b) Rate of pay.--Paid leave under subsection (a) shall be compensated at the employee's regular rate of pay, including any applicable shift differentials.(c) Eligibility.--An employee shall be eligible for paid leave under this section if the employee is unable to work or telework because of:(1) personal injury, illness or property loss resulting from a climate-related emergency;(2) the need to care for a child, dependent or family member affected by the climate-related emergency;(3) compliance with an evacuation order, road closure or public safety directive issued during the climate-related 20250HB1855PN2293 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 emergency; or(4) unsafe working conditions arising from a climate-related emergency.(d) Immediate availability.--Paid leave under this act shall be available immediately upon the occurrence of a climate-related emergency and may not require prior accrual or a waiting period.Section 5. Climate-related Emergency Paid Leave Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Climate-related Emergency Paid Leave Fund is established as a fund in the State Treasury.(b) Purpose.--The fund shall be used to reimburse employers for up to 50% of the costs of paid leave provided under this act.(c) Source of money.--The fund shall consist of:(1) Money appropriated by the General Assembly.(2) Federal disaster relief money allocated for wage replacement.(3) Other money made available from public or private sources.(d) Administration.--The department shall administer the fund and promulgate regulations to govern the application and reimbursement process from the fund.Section 6. Enforcement.(a) Duty of department.--The department shall enforce this act.(b) Complaints by employee.--An employee may file a complaint with the department if an employer fails to provide paid leave as required under this act.(c) Penalties.--An employer that violates this act shall be subject to:20250HB1855PN2293 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Payment of all wages owed to an employee.(2) An administrative penalty not to exceed $1,000 per violation.(3) Other relief deemed appropriate by the department.Section 7. Rules and regulations.The department shall issue rules or promulgate regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this act within 12 months of the effective date of this section.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB1855PN2293 - 5 - 12345678910